District of Columbia statutes.
6-1062.07

Eminent domain.

The Mayor shall not use eminent domain for any aspect of the revitalization or development of this site without the prior approval of the Council.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-278, § 207, 54 DCR 895